Wyoming, session 2026, HB0137.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 11-25-304(d) is amended to read:

11-25-304. Required permits and licenses; applicable
fees; tax imposition; taxation rate; distribution.

(d) Taxes shall be calculated and paid on a weekly
basis based on the net proceeds earned during the prior
week on skill based amusement games. On a weekly basis, the
HB0137

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0474
vendor shall remit to the commission an amount equivalent
to twenty percent (20%) twenty-five percent (25%) of the
net proceeds earned during the prior week on the vendor's
skill based amusement games. The taxes imposed under this
subsection may be prepaid as provided by rule of the
commission. The commission shall remit these monies to the
state treasurer for deposit in the commission gaming
account and for distribution of the tax as follows:

(i) Forty-five percent (45%) Thirty-six percent
(36%) to the county and the city or town in which the skill
based amusement game is located, in equal shares, or to the
county alone if the skill based amusement game is not
located within the boundaries of a city or town;

(ii) Forty-five percent (45%) Thirty-six percent
(36%) to the public school foundation program account;

(iii) Ten percent (10%) Eight percent (8%) to
the commission gaming account;.

(iv) Twenty percent (20%) to the state highway
fund.
HB0137

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0474

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0137